New York, session 2025-2026, S10286.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 380.85 of the criminal procedure law, as added by 2 chapter 477 of the laws of 2008, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 380.85 Reporting sentences to office of professional medical conduct; 4 licensed physician, physician assistant, or specialist 5 assistant. 6 Whenever a person who is a licensed physician, physician assistant, or 7 specialist assistant or a physician who is practicing under a limited 8 permit or as a medical resident is sentenced for a crime, the court that 9 has sentenced such person shall deliver a copy of the certificate of 10 conviction and provide notification of the conviction and sentence to 11 the office of professional medical conduct within twenty-four hours. 12 § 2. Subdivision 9 of section 2995-a of the public health law, as 13 amended by section 3 of part A of chapter 57 of the laws of 2015, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 9. (a) The department shall, in addition to hard copy physician 16 profiles, provide for electronic access to and copying of physician 17 profiles developed pursuant to this section through the system commonly 18 known as the Internet. The department shall update a physician's online 19 profile within thirty days of receipt of a completed physician profile 20 survey or any change in profile information. 21 (b) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary, 22 the department shall update a physician's online profile within forty- 23 eight hours of receipt of a copy of a certificate of conviction pursuant 24 to section 380.85 of the criminal procedure law. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06349-03-6